Washington statutes.
RCW 4.28.210

Appearance, what constitutes.

A defendant appears in an action when he or she answers, demurs, makes any application for an order therein, or gives the plaintiff written notice of his or her appearance. After appearance a defendant is entitled to notice of all subsequent proceedings; but when a defendant has not appeared, service of notice or papers in the ordinary proceedings in an action need not be made upon him or her. Every such appearance made in an action shall be deemed a general appearance, unless the defendant in making the same states that the same is a special appearance.

[ 2011 c 336 s 102; 1893 c 127 s 16; RRS s 241.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: Demurrers abolished—CR 7(c).